District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.02

Rulemaking.

The Mayor shall issue rules setting out the criteria by which the Bank Loan Committee shall evaluate loan applications and the terms that shall govern the loans, including procedures for repayment. The Bank Loan Committee shall not issue any loans until the publication of final rules to implement this subchapter, in accordance with Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.].

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1403, 46 DCR 6373
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 1403 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
1981 Ed., § 1-367.2.
This section is referenced in § 1-325.01.